Illinois, session 104th, SB4199.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the One 5Hundred Percent Citizen Participation in Elections Task Force 6Act. 7    Section 5. Findings and purpose. 8    (a) The General Assembly finds that:9        (1) A healthy democracy depends upon the broadest 10    possible participation of its citizens in the electoral 11    process. 12        (2) Illinois has historically experienced voter 13    participation rates significantly below 100% of eligible 14    citizens and that gap represents an unmet civic and 15    democratic aspiration. 16        (3) Numerous jurisdictions throughout the world have 17    adopted policies to encourage or require citizen 18    participation in elections as a civic duty and the 19    experiences of those jurisdictions offer instructive 20    lessons for Illinois. 21        (4) The State has an interest in understanding the 22    administrative, fiscal, and legal considerations 23    associated with achieving universal citizen participation   SB4199- 2 -LRB104 21806 SPS 37524 b1    in elections, including the needs of county clerks and 2    election administrators. 3        (5) Illinois has led the nation in reducing barriers 4    to voting, registration, and participation and has a long 5    tradition of encouraging and celebrating voting as central 6    to civic identification. 7        (6) Every generation has the noble opportunity to 8    build upon and grow the democratic foundations that have 9    been envisioned and implemented by our ancestors as rule 10    by the people through free and fair elections is neither 11    inevitable or enduring without an ongoing civic commitment 12    to the self-evident principle that every person is created 13    equal and deserves a voice in their government. 14    (b) It is therefore the purpose of this Act to establish a 15task force to examine policies, practices, and resources 16necessary to pursue and achieve the goal of 100% citizen 17participation in elections in Illinois by November 2030. 18    Section 10. Establishment of the Task Force. There is 19established the One Hundred Percent Citizen Participation in 20Elections Task Force. 21    Section 15. Duties of the Task Force. The Task Force shall 22study and report upon the following: 23        (1) efforts and strategies to achieve 100% citizen 24    participation in elections in this State by November 2030,   SB4199- 3 -LRB104 21806 SPS 37524 b1    including identification of barriers to participation and 2    evidence-based means of overcoming those barriers;3        (2) means of enhancing civic engagement generally in 4    this State, including civic education, community outreach, 5    multilingual voter services, and other measures designed 6    to increase democratic participation across all 7    communities;8        (3) the experiences of jurisdictions outside the 9    United States that have enacted policies that require 10    citizens to vote as a civic duty, including, but not 11    limited to, Argentina, Australia, Belgium, Bolivia, 12    Brazil, Democratic Republic of the Congo, Costa Rica, 13    Ecuador, Greece, Honduras, Liechtenstein, Luxembourg, 14    Mexico, Nauru, Panama, Paraguay, Peru, Singapore, 15    Thailand, and Uruguay, with particular attention to:16            (A) whether the jurisdictions impose fees or fines 17        for non-participation and the structure, amount, 18        enforcement mechanisms, and exemption processes 19        associated with any fees or fines; 20            (B) the effectiveness of the policies in achieving 21        high levels of citizen participation;22            (C) how the policies and practices could be 23        adapted for application in Illinois, including any 24        federal or State constitutional considerations and 25        comparisons to existing citizen obligations, including 26        jury duty; and  SB4199- 4 -LRB104 21806 SPS 37524 b1            (D) presentations or discussions with elected 2        officials or government representatives from 3        jurisdictions that have enacted policies to require 4        citizens to vote as a civic duty to show the history 5        and impact of the policies, both with and without any 6        fee, fine, or financial incentive or penalty for 7        complying with the legal requirement to vote;8        (4) potential implementation options and legislative 9    or administrative pathways in pursuit of achieving the 10    goal of 100% citizen participation in elections in this 11    State, including phased approaches, pilot programs, and 12    incentive-based models; 13        (5) the needs of county clerks and local election 14    administrators that would arise in jurisdictions in which 15    100% of eligible voters participate, including staffing, 16    facilities, equipment, early voting, vote-by-mail 17    infrastructure, and other operational requirements; and18        (6) county and State budgetary resources that may be 19    required to achieve the goal of 100% citizen participation 20    in elections, including estimated costs of expanded voter 21    outreach, administrative capacity, technology, and any 22    costs associated with the imposition or administration of 23    participation requirements. 24    Section 20. Membership. 25    (a) The Task Force shall consist of the following members:   SB4199- 5 -LRB104 21806 SPS 37524 b1        (1) two members of the majority caucus of the House of 2    Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of 3    Representatives;4        (2) one member of the minority caucus of the House of 5    Representatives, appointed by the Minority Leader of the 6    House of Representatives;7        (3) two members of the majority caucus of the Senate, 8    appointed by the President of the Senate;9        (4) one member of the minority caucus of the Senate, 10    appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate;11        (5) the Secretary of State or the Secretary's 12    designee;13        (6) one representative of an organization with 14    expertise in advocacy for universal or compulsory civic 15    voting, appointed by the Governor;16        (7) a representative of a statewide labor 17    organization, appointed by the Governor;18        (8) a representative of a statewide nonprofit 19    organization whose primary missions is advocacy on behalf 20    of African-American residents in Illinois, appointed by 21    the Governor;22        (9) a representative of a statewide nonprofit 23    organization whose primary mission is advocacy on behalf 24    of Latino residents in Illinois, appointed by the 25    Governor;26        (10) a representative of a statewide nonprofit   SB4199- 6 -LRB104 21806 SPS 37524 b1    organization whose primary mission is advocacy on behalf 2    of Asian-American residents in Illinois, appointed by the 3    Governor;4        (11) two county clerks or election administrators, 5    appointed by the Governor; and6        (12) two chief executives of county governments, 7    appointed by the Governor. 8    (b) Appointments shall be made within 60 days after the 9effective date of this Act. A vacancy on the Task Force shall 10be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. 11    (c) Members of the Task Force shall serve without 12compensation but may be reimbursed for reasonable and 13necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties, 14subject to the availability of funds. 15    Section 25. Organization. 16    (a) The Task Force shall elect a Chairperson and 17Vice-Chairperson from among its voting members at its first 18meeting. 19    (b) A majority of the voting members of the Task Force 20shall constitute a quorum. Action may be taken by the Task 21Force upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the members 22present at a meeting at which a quorum is present. 23    (c) The Task Force shall meet at the call of the 24Chairperson, but no fewer than 2 times per year. Meetings 25shall be open to the public in accordance with the Open   SB4199- 7 -LRB104 21806 SPS 37524 b1Meetings Act. 2    Section 30. Staffing and support. 3    (a) The State Board of Elections shall provide staff 4support, research assistance, and administrative services to 5the Task Force. 6    (b) The Task Force may request assistance, data, and 7information from any State agency, department, board, 8commission, or authority, and those entities shall cooperate 9with the requests to the extent permitted by law. 10    (c) The Task Force may seek and accept grants, gifts, or 11other contributions from public or private sources to support 12its work, subject to applicable State law. 13    Section 35. Report. 14    (a) No later than February 1, 2028, the Task Force shall 15submit an interim written report of its testimony and 16presentations from witnesses, initial findings, conclusions, 17and draft recommendations to the Governor, the President of 18the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the 19Minority Leader of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the 20House of Representatives. The report shall be filed with the 21Clerk of the House of Representatives and the Secretary of the 22Senate and made available to the public on the State Board of 23Elections website. 24    (b) No later than February 1, 2029, the Task Force shall   SB4199- 8 -LRB104 21806 SPS 37524 b1submit a final report of its testimony and presentations from 2witnesses, findings, conclusions and recommendation to the 3Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the 4House of Representatives, the Minority Leader of the Senate, 5and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives. The 6report shall be filed with the Clerk of the House of 7Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate and made 8available to the public on the State Board of Elections 9website. 10    (c) The report may include proposed legislation, proposed 11administrative rules, proposed pilot programs, presentations 12from witnesses, and any other recommendations the Task Force 13deems appropriate to advance the goal of 100% citizen 14participation in elections in this State. 15    (d) The Task Force may issue additional interim reports, 16compilations of testimony and presentations from witnesses, 17and initial recommendations at any time prior to submission of 18the final report. 19    Section 40. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 202030. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.